fst/nom_stems.lexc
! N93 — 10 entries
LEXICON N93_stems
  auprestun+N+Sg+Nom:auprestun  # ;
  enkāistwei+N+Sg+Nom:enkāistwei  # ;
  izprestun+N+Sg+Nom:izprestun  # ;
  kinstwei+N+Sg+Nom:kinstwei  # ;
  kāistwei+N+Sg+Nom:kāistwei  # ;
  prakāistwei+N+Sg+Nom:prakāistwei  # ;
  kūrstwei+N+Sg+Nom:kūrstwei  # ;
  paprestun+N+Sg+Nom:paprestun  # ;
  prestun+N+Sg+Nom:prestun  # ;
  wīstwei+N+Sg+Nom:wīstwei  # ;

! N94 — 7 entries
LEXICON N94_stems
  auplūstwei+N+Sg+Nom:auplūstwei  # ;
  izlīstwei+N+Sg+Nom:izlīstwei  # ;
  palīstun+N+Sg+Nom:palīstun  # ;
  līstwei+N+Sg+Nom:līstwei  # ;
  palīstwei+N+Sg+Nom:palīstwei  # ;
  slīstwei+N+Sg+Nom:slīstwei  # ;
  plūstun+N+Sg+Nom:plūstun  # ;

! N95 — 6 entries
LEXICON N95_stems
  āistwei+N+Sg+Nom:āistwei  # ;
  enāistwei+N+Sg+Nom:enāistwei  # ;
  izmīrstun+N+Sg+Nom:izmīrstun  # ;
  mīrstun+N+Sg+Nom:mīrstun  # ;
  paklustwei+N+Sg+Nom:paklustwei  # ;
  īlstwei+N+Sg+Nom:īlstwei  # ;

! N96 — 1 entries
LEXICON N96_stems
  grīmztwei+N+Sg+Nom:grīmztwei  # ;

! N97 — 41 entries
LEXICON N97_stems
  aukliptun+N+Sg+Nom:aukliptun  # ;
  auwīlktun+N+Sg+Nom:auwīlktun  # ;
  auwīngtun+N+Sg+Nom:auwīngtun  # ;
  auwīngtwei+N+Sg+Nom:auwīngtwei  # ;
  diltwei+N+Sg+Nom:diltwei  # ;
  dirtun+N+Sg+Nom:dirtun  # ;
  dirtwei+N+Sg+Nom:dirtwei  # ;
  ebtrīnktun+N+Sg+Nom:ebtrīnktun  # ;
  ebwīlktun+N+Sg+Nom:ebwīlktun  # ;
  enkīntwei+N+Sg+Nom:enkīntwei  # ;
  erkīntwei+N+Sg+Nom:erkīntwei  # ;
  etmīntun+N+Sg+Nom:etmīntun  # ;
  giltun+N+Sg+Nom:giltun  # ;
  gīmtwei+N+Sg+Nom:gīmtwei  # ;
  izwīngtwei+N+Sg+Nom:izwīngtwei  # ;
  wīngtwei+N+Sg+Nom:wīngtwei  # ;
  izmīntun+N+Sg+Nom:izmīntun  # ;
  izspīltun+N+Sg+Nom:izspīltun  # ;
  izwīlktun+N+Sg+Nom:izwīlktun  # ;
  kliptun+N+Sg+Nom:kliptun  # ;
  klīmptwei+N+Sg+Nom:klīmptwei  # ;
  kīntwei+N+Sg+Nom:kīntwei  # ;
  kīntwei+N+Sg+Nom:kīntwei  # ;
  kīrptun+N+Sg+Nom:kīrptun  # ;
  milztun+N+Sg+Nom:milztun  # ;
  pamīntun+N+Sg+Nom:pamīntun  # ;
  permīntun+N+Sg+Nom:permīntun  # ;
  pertrīnktun+N+Sg+Nom:pertrīnktun  # ;
  perwīlktun+N+Sg+Nom:perwīlktun  # ;
  spīltwei+N+Sg+Nom:spīltwei  # ;
  trīnktun+N+Sg+Nom:trīnktun  # ;
  senwinztun+N+Sg+Nom:senwinztun  # ;
  spīltun+N+Sg+Nom:spīltun  # ;
  spīltun+N+Sg+Nom:spīltun  # ;
  swīlptwei+N+Sg+Nom:swīlptwei  # ;
  sīrgtwei+N+Sg+Nom:sīrgtwei  # ;
  tilptwei+N+Sg+Nom:tilptwei  # ;
  tiltun+N+Sg+Nom:tiltun  # ;
  winztun+N+Sg+Nom:winztun  # ;
  wiptwei+N+Sg+Nom:wiptwei  # ;
  wīlktun+N+Sg+Nom:wīlktun  # ;

! N98 — 1 entries
LEXICON N98_stems
  grīnstun+N+Sg+Nom:grīnstun  # ;

! N99 — 2 entries
LEXICON N99_stems
  gibtwei+N+Sg+Nom:gibtwei  # ;
  swigtwei+N+Sg+Nom:swigtwei  # ;

! N100 — 1 entries
LEXICON N100_stems
  kwistwei+N+Sg+Nom:kwistwei  # ;

! N102 — 7 entries
LEXICON N102_stems
  enristun+N+Sg+Nom:enristun  # ;
  senristun+N+Sg+Nom:senristun  # ;
  perristun+N+Sg+Nom:perristun  # ;
  pistun+N+Sg+Nom:pistun  # ;
  sampistun+N+Sg+Nom:sampistun  # ;
  senpistun+N+Sg+Nom:senpistun  # ;
  ristun+N+Sg+Nom:ristun  # ;

! N104 — 2 entries
LEXICON N104_stems
  austātun+N+Sg+Nom:austātun  # ;
  pīrstwei+N+Sg+Nom:pīrstwei  # ;

! N106 — 9 entries
LEXICON N106_stems
  enleītun+N+Sg+Nom:enleītun  # ;
  grēitun+N+Sg+Nom:grēitun  # ;
  izleītun+N+Sg+Nom:izleītun  # ;
  leītun+N+Sg+Nom:leītun  # ;
  palēitun+N+Sg+Nom:palēitun  # ;
  praleītun+N+Sg+Nom:praleītun  # ;
  sensēitwei+N+Sg+Nom:sensēitwei  # ;
  sēitun+N+Sg+Nom:sēitun  # ;
  sēitwei+N+Sg+Nom:sēitwei  # ;

! N107 — 2 entries
LEXICON N107_stems
  sklāitun+N+Sg+Nom:sklāitun  # ;
  sklāitwei+N+Sg+Nom:sklāitwei  # ;

! N108 — 4 entries
LEXICON N108_stems
  ausītun+N+Sg+Nom:ausītun  # ;
  sensētun+N+Sg+Nom:sensētun  # ;
  sītwei+N+Sg+Nom:sītwei  # ;
  wītun+N+Sg+Nom:wītun  # ;

! N109 — 2 entries
LEXICON N109_stems
  auwirtwei+N+Sg+Nom:auwirtwei  # ;
  wirtwei+N+Sg+Nom:wirtwei  # ;

! N110 — 2 entries
LEXICON N110_stems
  pastātwei+N+Sg+Nom:pastātwei  # ;
  stātwei+N+Sg+Nom:stātwei  # ;

! N111 — 22 entries
LEXICON N111_stems
  augaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:augaūtun  # ;
  aupjaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:aupjaūtun  # ;
  aūtun+N+Sg+Nom:aūtun  # ;
  brjaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:brjaūtun  # ;
  ebaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:ebaūtun  # ;
  empjaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:empjaūtun  # ;
  engaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:engaūtun  # ;
  enkraūtun+N+Sg+Nom:enkraūtun  # ;
  etgaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:etgaūtun  # ;
  etkraūtun+N+Sg+Nom:etkraūtun  # ;
  gaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:gaūtun  # ;
  pagaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:pagaūtun  # ;
  izkraūtun+N+Sg+Nom:izkraūtun  # ;
  izpjaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:izpjaūtun  # ;
  izraūtun+N+Sg+Nom:izraūtun  # ;
  izraūtun+N+Sg+Nom:izraūtun  # ;
  kraūtun+N+Sg+Nom:kraūtun  # ;
  perkraūtun+N+Sg+Nom:perkraūtun  # ;
  perkraūtun+N+Sg+Nom:perkraūtun  # ;
  maūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:maūtwei  # ;
  pjaūtun+N+Sg+Nom:pjaūtun  # ;
  raūtun+N+Sg+Nom:raūtun  # ;

! N112 — 8 entries
LEXICON N112_stems
  ensūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:ensūtwei  # ;
  prasūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:prasūtwei  # ;
  pūtun+N+Sg+Nom:pūtun  # ;
  pūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:pūtwei  # ;
  sprūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:sprūtwei  # ;
  strūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:strūtwei  # ;
  sūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:sūtwei  # ;
  zūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:zūtwei  # ;

! N113 — 17 entries
LEXICON N113_stems
  aumūtun+N+Sg+Nom:aumūtun  # ;
  auplūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:auplūtwei  # ;
  ebwinūtun+N+Sg+Nom:ebwinūtun  # ;
  etwinūtun+N+Sg+Nom:etwinūtun  # ;
  izpūtun+N+Sg+Nom:izpūtun  # ;
  kaštūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:kaštūtwei  # ;
  krūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:krūtwei  # ;
  mātwei+N+Sg+Nom:mātwei  # ;
  mūtun+N+Sg+Nom:mūtun  # ;
  plūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:plūtwei  # ;
  preiplūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:preiplūtwei  # ;
  prapūtun+N+Sg+Nom:prapūtun  # ;
  preišūtun+N+Sg+Nom:preišūtun  # ;
  pūtun+N+Sg+Nom:pūtun  # ;
  sūtwei+N+Sg+Nom:sūtwei  # ;
  winūtun+N+Sg+Nom:winūtun  # ;
  šūtun+N+Sg+Nom:šūtun  # ;

! N114 — 2 entries
LEXICON N114_stems
  wīrstwei+N+Sg+Nom:wīrstwei  # ;
  wīrstwei+N+Sg+Nom:wīrstwei  # ;

! N115 — 1 entries
LEXICON N115_stems
  būtwei+N+Sg+Nom:būtwei  # ;

! N116 — 8 entries
LEXICON N116_stems
  auēitwei+N+Sg+Nom:auēitwei  # ;
  ebēitun+N+Sg+Nom:ebēitun  # ;
  enēitwei+N+Sg+Nom:enēitwei  # ;
  izēitwei+N+Sg+Nom:izēitwei  # ;
  perēitwei+N+Sg+Nom:perēitwei  # ;
  praēitwei+N+Sg+Nom:praēitwei  # ;
  preiēitwei+N+Sg+Nom:preiēitwei  # ;
  ēitwei+N+Sg+Nom:ēitwei  # ;

! N117 — 1 entries
LEXICON N117_stems
  ēstun+N+Sg+Nom:ēstun  # ;

! N118 — 10 entries
LEXICON N118_stems
  dātun+N+Sg+Nom:dātun  # ;
  dātun+N+Sg+Nom:dātun  # ;
  endātun+N+Sg+Nom:endātun  # ;
  etdātun+N+Sg+Nom:etdātun  # ;
  dātwei+N+Sg+Nom:dātwei  # ;
  sendātun+N+Sg+Nom:sendātun  # ;
  nadātun+N+Sg+Nom:nadātun  # ;
  padātun+N+Sg+Nom:padātun  # ;
  perdātun+N+Sg+Nom:perdātun  # ;
  preidātun+N+Sg+Nom:preidātun  # ;

! N119 — 7 entries
LEXICON N119_stems
  aujātwei+N+Sg+Nom:aujātwei  # ;
  izjātwei+N+Sg+Nom:izjātwei  # ;
  jātwei+N+Sg+Nom:jātwei  # ;
  perjātwei+N+Sg+Nom:perjātwei  # ;
  lātwei+N+Sg+Nom:lātwei  # ;
  plātwei+N+Sg+Nom:plātwei  # ;
  sētun+N+Sg+Nom:sētun  # ;

! N120 — 18 entries
LEXICON N120_stems
  perskītwei+N+Sg+Nom:perskītwei  # ;
  dītun+N+Sg+Nom:dītun  # ;
  endītun+N+Sg+Nom:endītun  # ;
  etnītwei+N+Sg+Nom:etnītwei  # ;
  etskītwei+N+Sg+Nom:etskītwei  # ;
  gītwei+N+Sg+Nom:gītwei  # ;
  izskītwei+N+Sg+Nom:izskītwei  # ;
  lītwei+N+Sg+Nom:lītwei  # ;
  paskītwei+N+Sg+Nom:paskītwei  # ;
  paspētun+N+Sg+Nom:paspētun  # ;
  paspētwei+N+Sg+Nom:paspētwei  # ;
  perspētun+N+Sg+Nom:perspētun  # ;
  praskītwei+N+Sg+Nom:praskītwei  # ;
  praspītun+N+Sg+Nom:praspītun  # ;
  senskītwei+N+Sg+Nom:senskītwei  # ;
  skītwei+N+Sg+Nom:skītwei  # ;
  spētwei+N+Sg+Nom:spētwei  # ;
  spētwei+N+Sg+Nom:spētwei  # ;

! N121 — 6 entries
LEXICON N121_stems
  audētun+N+Sg+Nom:audētun  # ;
  audētun+N+Sg+Nom:audētun  # ;
  dētun+N+Sg+Nom:dētun  # ;
  endētun+N+Sg+Nom:endētun  # ;
  izdētun+N+Sg+Nom:izdētun  # ;
  sendētun+N+Sg+Nom:sendētun  # ;

! N122 — 1 entries
LEXICON N122_stems
  waīstun+N+Sg+Nom:waīstun  # ;

! N123 — 1 entries
LEXICON N123_stems
  skrītwei+N+Sg+Nom:skrītwei  # ;

! N124 — 1 entries
LEXICON N124_stems
  snigtwei+N+Sg+Nom:snigtwei  # ;
